Missouri, session 2026, HB3159.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 660, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 660.760, to read as follows:
660.760. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Children's Due
Process Protection Act".
2. Subject to appropriation, the department of social services shall provide legal
counsel to every immigrant child under the age of eighteen residing in the state of
Missouri.
3. Children shall be appointed counsel as follows:
(1) Access to counsel shall begin at the time an immigrant child is designated as
unaccompanied by a federal or state agency or identified as such by an immigration
attorney;
(2) Access to counsel may apply in state court proceedings or to submitting an
affirmative filing for purposes of obtaining any order necessary for or relevant to
immigration remedies, federal immigration proceedings, any related appearances or
matters, and any appeals arising from those proceedings before the United States
Department of Homeland Security, the United States Department of Justice, or in
federal court;
(3) Access to counsel shall not be provided if the immigrant child has
independent counsel; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3159 2
(4) Access to counsel shall apply to any child designated as an immigrant child at
any time throughout the pendency of any of the proceedings in subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this subsection. If the immigrant child reaches eighteen years of age, he or she shall
remain eligible for access to counsel during the pendency of the proceedings initiated
before the immigrant child reached eighteen years of age.
4. Contracts under this section shall follow the procedures for state contracting
in chapter 34. The department shall contract to provide the legal counsel required
under this subsection with the following entities:
(1) Nonprofit legal services organizations that have at least three years handling
asylum, T-Visa, U-Visa, or special immigrant status cases and have represented at least
twenty-five individuals in these matters; and
(2) The office of the public defender, if the office has an immigration attorney
with at least three years of experience handling asylum, T-Visa, U-Visa, or special
immigrant juvenile status cases and has represented at least twenty minors in these
matters.
5. For the purposes of this section, an "immigrant child" is defined as either:
(1) An undocumented minor as described in 6 U.S.C. Section 279; or
(2) A person under eighteen years of age, with no lawful immigration status, and
who arrived in the United States without a parent or legal guardian or who has no
parent or legal guardian available and able to assist in the child's immigration
proceedings.
✔